Louisiana, session 2026, SB398.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 37:2150.1 and 2155(A) are hereby amended and reenacted and Part
II of Chapter 24 of Title 37 of the Louisiana Revised Statutes of 1950, comprised of R.S.
37:2176.1 through 2176.19, Part II-A of Chapter 24 of Title 37 of the Louisiana Revised
Page 1 of 48
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 398 ENROLLED
Statutes of 1950, comprised of R.S. 37:2177.1 through 2177.10, Part III of Chapter 24 of
Title 37 of the Louisiana Revised Statutes of 1950, comprised of R.S. 37:2177.21 through
2177.30, and Part IV of Chapter 24 of Title 37 of the Louisiana Revised Statutes of 1950,
comprised of R.S. 37:2177.51 through 2177.53, are hereby enacted to read as follows:
§2150.1. Definitions
As used in this Chapter, the following terms have the following meanings:
(1) "Board" means the State Licensing Board for Contractors.
(2) "Commercial" means any construction project except residential
structures intended to be primarily occupied as a residence with no more than two
separate dwelling units incorporated into one structure.
(3) "Contract" means an agreement to perform a scope of work that is
regulated by this Chapter. The project value includes the entire cost of the labor,
materials, rentals, and all direct and indirect project expenses. The cost of materials,
rentals, and direct and indirect expenses shall be included regardless of who pays the
costs or if they are donated. The "principal contract" is the agreement to perform the
entire scope of work for a construction project.
(4)(a) "Contractor" means any person who undertakes to, attempts to, or
submits a price or bid or offers to construct, supervise, superintend, oversee, direct,
perform, or in any manner assume charge of the construction, alteration, repair,
improvement, movement, demolition, putting up, tearing down, furnishing labor, or
furnishing labor together with material or equipment, or installing material or
equipment for any of the following:
(i) Any building, highway, road, railroad, sewer, grading, excavation,
pipeline, public utility structure, project development, housing, or housing
development, improvement, or any other construction undertaking for which the
project value is fifty thousand dollars or more when the property is to be used for
commercial purposes.
(ii) Any new residential structure for which the project value is fifty thousand
dollars or more when the property is used for residential purposes.
(iii) Any improvements or repairs to an existing residential structure for
Page 2 of 48
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 398 ENROLLED
which the project value is seven thousand five hundred dollars or more.
(iv) Any mold remediation for which the project value is seven thousand five
hundred dollars or more.
(b) The term "contractor" includes persons who receive an additional fee for
the employment or direction of labor, or any other work beyond the normal
architectural or engineering services.
(c) A contractor holding a license in the major classification of hazardous
materials, or any subclassifications thereunder, is defined in terms of work
performed for which the project value is one dollar or more.
(d) "Contractor" does not mean any person, supplier, manufacturer, or
employee of such person who assembles, repairs, maintains, moves, puts up, tears
down, or disassembles any patented or proprietary equipment supplied by such
person to a contractor to be used solely by the contractor for a construction
undertaking. "Proprietary" means specific and specialized equipment installation,
manufacturing processes, used, or components that are protected from disclosure to
third parties by the owner or manufacturer of the equipment.
(5) "Controlled access" means the complete building or facility area under
direct physical control within which an unauthorized person is denied access.
(6) "Electrical contractor" means any person who undertakes to, attempts to,
or submits a price or bid or offers to construct, supervise, superintend, oversee,
direct, perform, or in any manner assume charge of the construction, alteration,
repair, improvement, movement, demolition, putting up, tearing down, or furnishing
labor together with material and equipment, or installing the same for the wiring,
fixtures, or appliances for the supply of electricity to any residential, commercial, or
other project, for which the project value is ten thousand dollars or more. This
Paragraph is not deemed or construed to limit the authority of a contractor, general
contractor, or residential contractor, as those terms are defined in this Section, nor
to require such individuals to become an electrical contractor.
(7) "Employee" means a worker whose employer deducts taxes from his
wages and reports his annual earnings to the Internal Revenue Service using a W-2
Page 3 of 48
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 398 ENROLLED
form.
(8) "Executive director" means the person appointed by the board to serve as
the chief operating officer in connection with the day-to-day operation of the board's
business. The executive director is the appointing authority for all employees of the
board.
(9) "Extraordinary circumstances" means a federally declared disaster,
a gubernatorially declared disaster or emergency, a pandemic, or an illness or
emergency medical condition.
(10)(a) "Factory-built housing developer" means any person, group of
persons, firm, partnership, corporation, association, company, or legal entity
that sells, leases, or offers for sale or lease to the public, a lot together with the
sale of a manufactured home permanently installed and fixed on a foundation
on the lot and designed as a single-family residence.
(b) "Factory-built housing developer" does not include any of the
following:
(i) An individual selling his personal residence.
(ii) A real estate broker or real estate salesman retained by a person to
sell a manufactured home together with a lot on which the manufactured home
has been installed and fixed on a foundation.
(iii) A federally insured financial institution, its subsidiaries, or affiliates.
(11) "Factory-built housing dealer" means any person who is engaged,
wholly or in part, in the business of buying, selling, distributing, brokering, or
exchanging an interest in a manufactured or modular home with the intent to
make a profit, monetary gain, or any thing of economic value. Any person who
buys, sells, distributes, brokers, or exchanges an interest in more than one such
manufactured or modular home in any twelve-month period shall be presumed
to be a factory-built housing dealer. "Factory-built housing dealer" does not
include any of the following:
(a) A public officer while performing his official duties.
(b) A receiver, trustee, administrator, executor, guardian, or any other
Page 4 of 48
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 398 ENROLLED
person appointed by or acting pursuant to a judgment or order of any court.
(c) A federally insured financial institution, its subsidiaries, or affiliates;
a finance company; or any other loan agency, whose principal place of business
is located in Louisiana that acquires manufactured housing as an incident to its
regular business.
(d) A developer, a contractor licensed as a factory-built housing
developer as provided in this Section, or a real estate broker or real estate
salesman retained by a person to sell a manufactured home together with
immovable property on which the manufactured home is located.
(e)(i) A manufactured housing community or park owner that sells less
than three manufactured homes in a twelve-month period, provided the
community or park owner has owned and leased the manufactured home being
sold for more than one year.
(ii) Notwithstanding Item (e)(i) of this Subparagraph, a manufactured
housing community or park owner may sell more than three used manufactured
homes in any twelve-month period if any used manufactured home sold after
the original three used manufactured homes meets the following:
(aa) Twenty years old or older at the time of sale.
(bb) Sold for a total sale price of ten thousand dollars or less, including
delivery and installation.
(cc) Habitable upon completion of delivery and installation.
(dd) Sold with a thirty-day habitability warranty.
(9)(12)(a) "General contractor" means a person who contracts directly with
the owner. The term "general contractor" includes the term "primary contractor" and
wherever used in this Chapter or in regulations promulgated thereunder "primary
contractor" means "general contractor".
(b) "General contractor" does not mean any person, supplier, manufacturer,
or employee of such person who assembles, repairs, maintains, moves, puts up, tears
down, or disassembles any patented or proprietary equipment supplied by such
person to a contractor to be used solely by the contractor for a construction
Page 5 of 48
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 398 ENROLLED
undertaking.
(10)(13) "Home improvement" means the reconstruction, alteration,
renovation, repair, modernization, conversion, improvement, removal, or demolition,
or the construction of an addition to any preexisting residential structure which
building is used or designed to be used as a residence or dwelling unit, or to
structures which are adjacent to such residence or building for which the project
value is seven thousand five hundred dollars or more. "Home improvement" does not
include services rendered gratuitously.
(11)(14) "Home improvement contractor" means any person who undertakes
or attempts to undertake or submits a price or bid or offers to construct, supervise,
superintend, oversee, direct, perform, or in any manner assume charge of a home
improvement project for which the project value is at least seven thousand five
hundred dollars but less than fifty thousand dollars. A home improvement contractor
shall not perform any structural work that is integral to the structural integrity of any
new or existing structure, including but not limited to footings, foundations, outside
walls, skeleton, bearing columns and interior load bearing walls, floor slabs, or
roofing systems to any type.
(12)(15) "License" means any form of license or registration the board is
authorized to issue in accordance with this Chapter.
(16) "Manufactured home" and "manufactured housing" means a
factory-built, residential dwelling unit constructed to standards and codes, as
promulgated by the United States Department of Housing and Urban
Development (HUD), pursuant to the National Manufactured Housing
Construction and Safety Standards Act of 1974, 42 U.S.C. 5401 et seq., as
amended. The terms "manufactured home" and "manufactured housing" may
be used interchangeably and apply to structures bearing the permanently
affixed seal of the United States Department of Housing and Urban
Development.
(17)"Manufactured housing code" means the National Manufactured
Home Construction and Safety Standards Act of 1974, 42 U.S.C. 5401 et seq.,
Page 6 of 48
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 398 ENROLLED
as amended, and federal regulations promulgated pursuant thereto, along with
any construction or installation-related standards adopted by the residential
subcommittee of the State Licensing Board for Contractors.
(18) "Manufacturer" means any person who manufactures
manufactured or modular housing.
(13)(19) "Mechanical contractor" means any person who undertakes to,
attempts to, or submits a price or bid or offers to construct, supervise, superintend,
oversee, direct, perform, or in any manner assume charge of the construction,
alteration, repair, improvement, movement, demolition, putting up, tearing down, or
furnishing labor, or furnishing labor together with material and equipment, or
installing the same for the construction, installation, maintenance, testing, and repair
of air conditioning, refrigeration, heating systems, and plumbing for all residential,
commercial, and industrial applications as well as ventilation systems, mechanical
work controls, boilers and other pressure vessels, steam and hot water systems and
piping, gas piping and fuel storage, and chilled water and condensing water systems
and piping, including but not limited to any type of industrial process piping and
related valves, fittings, and components, for which the project value is ten thousand
dollars or more. This Paragraph is not deemed or construed to limit the authority of
a contractor, general contractor, or residential contractor, as those terms are defined
in this Section, nor to require such individuals to become a mechanical contractor.
(20) "Mobile home" means a factory-built, residential dwelling unit built
to voluntary standards prior to the passage of the National Manufactured
Housing Construction and Safety Standards Act of 1974, 42 U.S.C. 5401 et seq.
"Mobile home" includes and is interchangeable with the term "house trailer",
but does not include the term "manufactured home".
(21) "Modular home" and "modular housing" mean a factory-built,
residential dwelling unit built to the International Residential Code as adopted
by the Louisiana State Uniform Construction Code Council.
(22) "Modular housing code" means the International Residential Code
as adopted by the Louisiana State Uniform Construction Code Council.
Page 7 of 48
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 398 ENROLLED
(14)(23) "Mold remediation contractor" means any person who engages in
removal, cleaning, sanitizing, demolition, or other treatment, including preventative
activities, of mold or mold-contaminated matter that was not purposely grown at that
location for which the project value is seven thousand five hundred dollars or more.
Mold remediation applies only to the regulation of mold-related activities that affect
indoor air quality and does not apply to routine cleaning when not conducted for the
purpose of mold-related activities intended to affect indoor air quality.
(15)(24) "Person" means any individual, firm, partnership, association,
cooperative, corporation, limited liability company, limited liability partnership, or
any other entity recognized by Louisiana law; and whether or not acting as a
principal, trustee, fiduciary, receiver, or as any other kind of legal or personal
representative, or as a successor in interest, assignee, agent, factor, servant,
employee, director, officer, or any other representative of such person; or any state
or local governing authority or political subdivision.
(16)(25) "Plumbing contractor" means any person who installs, maintains,
and repairs potable and nonpotable tap water or sewer systems within a building
structure or residential structure for which the project value is ten thousand dollars
or more.
(17)(26) "Principal" means an owner, shareholder, or an officer or director
of a corporation; a member or manager of a limited liability company; a general
partner of a partnership; a sole proprietor; a trustee; or a full-time employee with
similar operational control or significant influence with respect to any person as
determined by the board.
(18)(27) "Qualifying party" means a natural person designated by the
contractor to represent the contractor for the purpose of complying with the
provisions of this Chapter including but not limited to meeting the requirements for
the initial license and any continuation thereof.
(19)(28)(a) "Residential contractor" means any person who constructs a fixed
building or structure for sale or use by another as a residence or who, for a price,
commission, fee, wage, or other compensation, undertakes or offers to undertake the
Page 8 of 48
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 398 ENROLLED
construction or superintending of the construction of any residential structure which
is not more than three floors in height, to be used by another as a residence, for
which the project value is fifty thousand dollars or more. The term "residential
contractor" includes all persons who receive an additional fee for the employment
or direction of labor, or any other work beyond the normal architectural or
engineering services.
(b) "Residential contractor" includes both of the following:
(i) Any person bidding or performing home improvement for which the
project value is seven thousand five hundred dollars or more.
(ii) Any person performing the installation of a modular home with a value
equal to or greater than fifty thousand dollars for which the total project value shall
not include the cost of the component parts of the modular home in the condition
each part leaves the factory pursuant to R.S. 40:1730.71.
(c) "Residential contractor" does not include any person engaged in building
residential structures that are built to the United States Department of Housing and
Urban Development's construction standards for manufactured housing as outlined
at 42 U.S.C. 5401 et seq., or mounted on a metal chassis and wheels.
(20)(29) "Residential roofing" means the construction, alteration, repair,
improvement, demolition, putting up, tearing down, furnishing labor, or furnishing
labor together with materials or equipment, or the installation of materials or
equipment for any phase of roofing specific to a residential structure for which the
project value is seven thousand five hundred dollars or more.
(21)(30) "Residential roofing contractor" means any person who undertakes
to, attempts to, or submits a price or bid, or offers to construct, supervise,
superintend, oversee, direct, perform, or in any manner assume charge of a
residential roofing project for which the project value is seven thousand five hundred
dollars or more.
(22)(31) "Residential structure" means a building or structure that is used
primarily for occupancy by a person as a residence. Such structures or buildings
include but are not limited to single family dwellings and duplexes which are not
Page 9 of 48
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 398 ENROLLED
more than three floors in height and structures that are part of or adjacent to the
building or structures to be used as a residence. A residential structure more than
three floors in height may be built by a person holding a building construction and
residential construction license.
(32) "Residential subcommittee" means the Residential Contractors
Subcommittee of the State Licensing Board for Contractors.
(33) "Salesman" means any person employed by a factory-built housing
dealer or factory-built housing developer for purposes of selling manufactured
or modular housing to the public.
(34) "Seal" or "label" means the permanently affixed device or insignia
issued by the United States Department of Housing and Urban Development
(HUD) or other authority having jurisdiction that is displayed on the exterior
of a factory-built manufactured or modular home, certifying that the home is
in compliance with the manufactured housing code or the modular housing
code.
(23)(35) "Subcontract" means an agreement to perform a portion of the scope
of work contained in the principal contract including the entire cost of labor and
materials of that part of the principal contract which is performed by the
subcontractor.
(24)(36)(a) "Subcontractor" means a person who contracts to perform a scope
of work that is a part of the scope of work contained in the principal contract.
(b) "Subcontractor" does not include any person, supplier, or manufacturer
who assembles, repairs, maintains, moves, puts up, tears down, or disassembles any
patented or proprietary equipment supplied by such person to a contractor to be used
solely by the contractor for a construction undertaking.
(37) "Transporter" means an individual who transports a manufactured
or modular home to a site of installation but does not perform any blocking or
anchoring of the home, however, a transporter is allowed to put blocks under
the hitch on the tongue of the frame.
* * *
Page 10 of 48
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 398 ENROLLED
§2155. Residential Contractors Subcommittee; membership; terms; powers; duties
A. There is hereby established within the board the Residential Contractors
Subcommittee, hereinafter referred to as "residential subcommittee", consisting of
five nine members who shall be residents of this state and who have been actively
engaged in residential contracting or the manufactured and modular housing
industry for at least five years prior to appointment by the governor. Three members
of the residential subcommittee shall be appointed by the governor from a list of not
less than ten names submitted by the Louisiana Homebuilders Association as
certified by its president and secretary. One member of the residential subcommittee
shall be from and appointed to represent the first congressional district, one member
shall be from and appointed to represent the second congressional district, one
member shall be from and appointed to represent the third congressional district, one
member shall be from and appointed to represent the fourth and fifth congressional
districts, and one member shall be from and appointed to represent the sixth
congressional district. Three members of the residential subcommittee shall be
appointed by the governor from a list of not less than ten names submitted by
the Louisiana Manufactured Housing Association as certified by its president
and secretary. One member of the residential subcommittee shall be appointed
by the governor to represent each congressional district. Two members shall be
appointed by the governor as at-large members.
* * *
PART II. FACTORY-BUILT HOUSING
§2176.1. Short title
This Part shall be known and may be cited as "Uniform Standards Code
for Manufactured and Factory-Built Housing".
§2176.2. Establishment of uniform standards codes
All new manufactured or modular homes, as defined in R.S. 37:2150.1,
which are sold or offered for sale in this state shall be in compliance with the
manufactured housing code or the modular housing code and the requirements
of this Part.
Page 11 of 48
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 398 ENROLLED
§2176.3. License required; qualifications; application; issuance; transfer;
criminal history record information; bond
A.(1) A manufacturer, factory-built housing dealer, or salesman within
or without this state shall not sell or offer for sale in this state any mobile home,
modular home, or manufactured housing unless he has obtained a valid
manufacturer's, factory-built housing dealer's, or salesman's license, whichever
is applicable, from the residential subcommittee as provided in this Part.
(2) A factory-built housing developer shall not sell or offer for sale to the
public any manufactured or modular home unless he has obtained a license
from the residential subcommittee, as provided in this Part. An employee of a
factory-built housing developer shall not offer manufactured or modular
housing for sale to the general public without first obtaining a salesman license
or being a licensed real estate agent.
(3) A manufacturer, within or without this state, shall not sell, or offer
for sale to a person, any manufactured or modular housing for resale to the
public unless the person has obtained a valid factory-built housing dealer's or
factory-built housing developer's license from the residential subcommittee as
provided in this Part.
(4) A license shall be issued when the requirements of this Part are met
as herein provided.
(5) The residential subcommittee may, by rule and regulation
promulgated in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act, provide for
staggered renewal and collection of the annual license fees imposed pursuant to
R.S. 37:2176.6.
(6) A factory-built housing dealer or factory-built housing developer
shall not offer for sale to the public any new manufactured or modular home
unless the manufacturer of the home has obtained a valid manufacturer's
license.
B. Application for a manufacturer's license shall be made upon the form
prescribed by the residential subcommittee and shall contain all of the
Page 12 of 48
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 398 ENROLLED
following:
(1) The name and address of the applicant.
(2) The name and address of each partner if the applicant is a
partnership.
(3) The names of the principal officers and the state in which
incorporated, if the applicant is a corporation.
(4) The place or places where the applicant's business is to be conducted.
(5) Any other reasonable information as may be required by the
residential subcommittee.
C.(1) A factory-built housing dealer's, factory-built housing developer's,
or salesman's license shall not be issued to any person who has not attained the
age of eighteen years.
(2) Each applicant for an original factory-built housing dealer's or
developer's license shall have first served actively for one year as a salesman or
shall have purchased an existing factory-built housing dealer's business.
(3) Each retailer and developer shall be required to have at least one
licensed salesman.
D. Every application for license shall be verified by the oath or
affirmation of the applicant if an individual or if the applicant is a partnership
or corporation, by a partner or officer of the partnership or corporation. The
applications for licenses shall be in the form and detail as prescribed by the
residential subcommittee.
E.(1) The applicant, each principal, and each designated qualifying party
shall complete an application and pass a background investigation. An applicant
shall provide all information or documentation requested by the board,
including but not limited to documentation relative to identification, criminal
history, and financial history. The board may deny approval of the applicant,
any of its principals, or any qualifying party for cause. The background
investigation shall be conducted in relation to all of the following:
(a) Fiduciary or monetary matters including but not limited to any
Page 13 of 48
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 398 ENROLLED
bankruptcy, judgment, insolvency, or lien.
(b) Any criminal offense resulting in a conviction, guilty plea, or plea of
nolo contendere.
(2) The residential subcommittee may deny approval of an applicant, a
principal, or a designated qualifying party for any of the following reasons:
(a) For cause.
(b) The applicant, principal, or designated qualifying party does not have
an established place of business that is used or will be used for the purpose of
selling, displaying, and offering for sale or dealing in manufactured housing.
(c) For a violation of any provision of this Part.
F.(1) Any manufacturer or factory-built housing dealer before removing
any one or more of his places of business or opening any additional place of
business shall apply to the residential subcommittee and obtain a separate
license for each place of business to which he intends to move and for each
additional place of business and pay the applicable fee, as provided in this Part,
for each place of business to which he moves and for each additional place of
business.
(2) A licensed salesman transferring employment from one factory-built
housing residential contractor to another factory-built housing dealer shall
apply to the residential subcommittee for a transfer of his salesman's license
within fifteen days after the date of his transfer of employment and shall pay the
applicable fee as provided in this Part. The application for transfer shall be in
a form prescribed by the residential subcommittee.
G.(1) Except as provided for in Paragraph (2) of this Subsection,
beginning January 1, 1983, every license issued pursuant to this Part shall be
issued annually and shall expire on December thirty-first following the date
upon which it was issued. Each license issued shall be renewed annually, and
failure to apply for a renewal license by January first of the ensuing license
period shall automatically suspend the license until a renewal license is applied
for. During the period of suspension, any practice by the licensee under the
Page 14 of 48
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 398 ENROLLED
color of such license shall be deemed a violation of this Part. Applications made
during the period of suspension shall require the payment of a fee equal to twice
the amount of the license renewal fee as set forth in R.S. 37:2176.6. If a license
is not renewed within a period of one year from the date of its expiration, it is
no longer eligible for renewal. An application for a new license may be
submitted and upon approval, a new license shall be issued. Renewal of a
factory-built housing dealer license shall require each factory-built housing
dealer to certify that he has maintained a record of providing satisfactory
service to consumers.
(2) Beginning January 1, 2020, the residential subcommittee may, by rule
and regulation promulgated in accordance with the Administrative Procedure
Act, provide for staggered renewal and collection of the annual license fees
imposed pursuant to R.S. 37:2176.6. Any rule and regulation promulgated
pursuant to the provisions of this Paragraph providing for the staggered
issuance and renewal of a license shall require that the license be renewed
twelve months after issuance annually, and failure to apply for the renewal
license shall automatically suspend the license until a renewal license is applied
for. During the period of suspension any practice by the licensee under the color
of such license shall be deemed a violation of this Part. Applications made
during the period of suspension shall require the payment of a fee equal to twice
the amount of the license renewal fee as set forth in R.S. 37:2176.6. If a license
is not renewed within a period of one year from the date of its expiration, it is
no longer eligible for renewal. An application for a new license may be
submitted and upon approval, a new license shall be issued. Renewal of a
factory-built housing dealer's license shall require the factory-built housing
dealer to certify that he has maintained a record of providing satisfactory
service to consumers.
H.(1) The residential subcommittee may request and obtain from the
Department of Public Safety and Corrections, Bureau of Criminal Identification
and Information, hereinafter referred to as the "bureau", criminal history
Page 15 of 48
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 398 ENROLLED
record information as defined in R.S. 37:763.1 of any person applying for any
license that the residential subcommittee is authorized by law to issue and shall
pay a fee as specified in R.S. 15:587.
(2) The applicant shall submit fingerprints and other identifying
information to the residential subcommittee, which shall then submit that
information to the bureau, and the bureau shall, upon request of the residential
subcommittee and after receipt of the fingerprint card and other identifying
information from the residential subcommittee, make available to the
residential subcommittee all arrest and conviction information contained in the
bureau's criminal history record and identification files pertaining to the
applicant.
(3) The residential subcommittee may charge and collect from an
applicant for any license which the board is authorized to issue, in addition to
all other applicable fees and costs, the amount incurred by the residential
subcommittee in requesting and obtaining criminal history record information
of that applicant.
I.(1) All factory-built housing dealers and factory-built housing
developers shall annually take a residential subcommittee-approved continuing
education course. The individual required to take the continuing education
course is the individual license holder; for corporations, an officer or manager;
for partnerships, a partner or manager. The residential subcommittee shall set
the educational requirements pursuant to R.S. 37:2155(G)(3).
(2) All factory-built housing dealers and factory-built housing developers
shall provide annually along with the license application a surety bond in the
amount of two hundred fifty thousand dollars or post a fifty thousand dollar
irrevocable letter of credit with the residential subcommittee for consumer
protection and proof of net worth.
(3) Any person applying for an original factory-built housing dealer's
license or an original factory-built housing developer's license after January 1,
2004, shall take a class and pass an accompanying test prior to receiving his
Page 16 of 48
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 398 ENROLLED
original license. The residential subcommittee shall develop the class and test.
The fee for the factory-built housing dealer and factory-built housing developer
class and test shall be set by rule and shall not exceed one hundred dollars.
J. The residential subcommittee shall require that factory-built housing
dealers, residential contractors, factory-built housing developers, transporters,
and installers show proof of continued and ongoing general liability insurance
coverage of at least five hundred thousand dollars. Manufacturers shall be
required to show proof of continued and ongoing liability insurance coverage
of at least one million dollars.
§2176.4. Manufactured home factory-built housing dealers manufacturer
relationship; warranty work; requirements upon termination;
penalty; indemnity
A.(1) If a factory-built housing dealer ceases to do business with a
manufacturer due to any of the following: the manufacturer refuses to honor
an agreed-upon sales territory; the manufacturer refuses to pay warranty
claims within sixty days or perform major warranty work beyond the scope
expected of a factory-built housing dealer within sixty days; or the
manufacturer can no longer deliver the product requested by the factory-built
housing dealer in a reasonable and timely manner, then after notice thereof to
the manufacturer by registered or certified mail return receipt requested within
thirty days thereafter, the manufacturer, at a minimum, shall repurchase all
new and unused manufactured homes of the current or immediately prior
model year and parts on hand that have not been damaged or substantially
altered to the prejudice of the manufacturer while in the possession of the
factory-built housing dealer and all required demonstrators.
(2) The manufacturer shall make the required repurchase after the
factory-built housing dealer terminates his franchise, sales, or any other
contractual agreement, and within sixty days of the submission by the factory-
built housing dealer to the manufacturer, by registered or certified mail return
receipt requested, of a final inventory of manufactured homes and parts on
Page 17 of 48
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 398 ENROLLED
hand.
(3) Failure to make the repurchase without just cause shall subject the
manufacturer to a penalty of one and one-half percent per month, or a fraction
thereof, of the inventory value of returnable manufactured homes and parts,
payable to the factory-built housing dealer, until repurchase is made.
B. Any warranty work performed by a manufactured home factory-built
housing dealer pursuant to a manufacturer's warranty shall be reimbursed by
the manufacturer within sixty days of invoicing for those services at a labor rate
equal to but not in excess of the labor rate in effect at that retail dealership at
the time that the warranty work is performed. The reimbursement amount shall
also include reasonable costs for parts and mileage related to the performance
of the warranty work.
C. Notwithstanding the terms of any franchise, sales, or other
contractual agreement, each manufacturer shall indemnify and hold harmless
its factory-built housing dealer against any judgment for damages, including
but not limited to court costs and reasonable attorney fees of the factory-built
housing dealer, arising out of complaints, claims, or lawsuits including but not
limited to strict liability, negligence, misrepresentation, express or implied
warranty, or rescission of sale to the extent that the judgment arises out of
alleged defective or negligent manufacture, assembly, or design of
manufactured homes, parts, or accessories or other functions of the
manufacturer, which are beyond the control of the factory-built housing dealer.
D. Prior to making a change in an area of responsibility described in the
franchise, sales, or any other contractual agreement or sales and service
agreement with a factory-built housing dealer, the franchisor or manufacturer
shall give the factory-built housing dealer no less than sixty days prior written
notice, by certified or registered mail.
§2176.5. Residential subcommittee
A. The powers and duties of the residential subcommittee include but are
not limited to the following:
Page 18 of 48
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 398 ENROLLED
(1) Licensing of manufacturers, factory-built housing dealers, factory-
built housing developers, salesmen, transporters, and installers as provided in
this Part and Part II-A of this Chapter.
(2) Working with consumers, manufacturers, factory-built housing
dealers, factory-built housing developers, salesmen, transporters, and installers
to hear complaints and make determinations relating to construction defects,
warranty issues, service complaints, and other matters which are not set forth
pursuant to 24 CFR Parts 3280 and 3282. The residential subcommittee may,
prior to convening a formal hearing, establish a date for mediation and in its
discretion, the residential subcommittee may defer its authority to conduct a
hearing and render a determination to an independent third-party mediator to
hear and resolve complaints brought before the residential subcommittee. If the
complaint is not resolved through mediation, the residential subcommittee may
appoint a three-member panel to conduct an initial review of the complaint. All
costs associated with such mediation shall be borne by the board.
(3) Establishing an alternative dispute resolution process for
manufactured and modular home consumers in this state. The residential
subcommittee may charge a reasonable fee to defray the cost of establishing the
alternative dispute resolution process.
(4) Requiring all licensees to maintain their records for a period of three
years and to keep their records open to inspection by any authorized employee
of the residential subcommittee during reasonable hours.
(5) Issuing cease and desist orders, and subpoenaing individuals and
records as it deems necessary.
(6) Taking action against any person or licensee that violates this Part or
Part II-A of this Chapter.
(7) Reviewing and approving continuing education course work,
required pursuant to this Part or Part II-A of this Chapter, offered in another
state, if that other state allows for reciprocity of Louisiana continuing education
course work.
Page 19 of 48
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 398 ENROLLED
(8) Establishing a mandatory uniform written transportation and
installation contract that is required to be used by all transporters and installers
when moving or installing a manufactured or modular home in this state.
Transporters and installers are required to give their customers a copy of the
contract, itemizing all services being provided and the cost associated with those
services, prior to beginning work or moving a home. These records shall be
maintained for at least three years and shall be made available to the residential
subcommittee for inspection. Transporters who are only passing through the
state, or are delivering a home from a manufacturer to a licensee of the
residential subcommittee, are not required to comply with the provisions of this
Paragraph. The residential subcommittee may adopt rules in accordance with
the Administrative Procedure Act as are necessary to implement the provisions
of this Paragraph.
(9) Adopting rules governing the repairs or renovations of manufactured
homes.
(10) Conducting meetings by remote access.
B. All expenses incurred by the residential subcommittee in carrying out
the provisions of this Part shall be proper charges against the Residential
Subcommittee Manufactured Housing Dedicated Fund Account.
§2176.6. Fees; disposition; creation of a dedicated fund account
A. The residential subcommittee shall impose and collect the following
schedule of fees:
(1) Original manufacturer's license $250.00
(2) Manufacturer's renewal license $250.00
(3) Original retailer's license $150.00
(4) Factory-built housing dealer's renewal license $150.00
(5) Original salesman's license $50.00
(6) Salesman's renewal license $50.00
(7) Transfer of salesman's license $5.00
(8) Factory-built housing dealer's branch office license $75.00
Page 20 of 48
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 398 ENROLLED
(9) Factory-built housing developer's original or renewal license $150.00
B.(1) There is hereby established in the state treasury, as a dedicated
fund account, the Residential Subcommittee Manufactured Housing Dedicated
Fund Account, hereinafter referred to in this Section as the "account".
(2) After allocation of money to the Bond Security and Redemption Fund
as provided in Article VII, Section (9)(B) of the Constitution of Louisiana, the
state treasurer shall deposit into the account all fines or fees collected pursuant
to the provisions of this Part, Part II-A, and Part III of this Chapter. Monies
deposited into the account shall be categorized as fees and self-generated
revenues related to the executive budget and its supporting documents and any
appropriation bills.
(3) Monies in the account shall be appropriated to the office of the
governor for the activities of the residential subcommittee in implementing and
enforcing the manufactured housing provisions of this Part, Part II-A, and Part
III of this Chapter.
(4) Monies in the account shall be invested in the same manner as monies
in the state general fund. Interest earned on investment of monies in the account
shall be credited to the account. Unexpended and unencumbered monies in the
account at the end of the fiscal year shall remain in the account.
§2176.7. Motor vehicle inspection; exception
The provisions of Chapter 7 of Title 32 of the Louisiana Revised Statutes
of 1950, relative to inspections do not apply to manufactured or modular
housing.
§2176.8. Serial numbers on manufactured and modular homes
A serial number shall be stamped by the manufacturer on the header
plate or front cross member of the frame so that it can be easily read. It may not
contain more than fifteen digits. Any multiple units shall contain the same serial
number with letters of the alphabet designating that each is a different, separate
unit. Starting with the letter "A", each unit addition shall be in alphabetical
order. The letter shall be stamped at the end of the serial number.
Page 21 of 48
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 398 ENROLLED
§2176.9. Administration and enforcement; powers of residential subcommittee;
cease and desist orders; applicability of Administrative
Procedure Act
A.(1) The residential subcommittee is charged with the adoption,
administration, and enforcement of manufactured housing construction and
safety standards and any other rules and regulations necessary for the
administration and enforcement of this Part which are not set forth pursuant
to 24 CFR Part 3280 and CFR Part 3282, Subpart I.
(2) The residential subcommittee may adopt, pursuant to the
Administrative Procedure Act, such rules and regulations as are necessary to
enforce the standards promulgated pursuant to this Section and any other rules
and regulations necessary for the administration and enforcement of this Part.
(3) For the performance of duties required pursuant to the provisions of
this Part, including but not limited to the inspections necessary to administer
and enforce the standards, rules, or regulations adopted pursuant to this
Subsection, the residential subcommittee may adopt fees by rule promulgation
for services performed in conducting the inspections.
B. The board may contract for professional services and may hire
employees as it deems necessary for the performance of its functions required
or authorized by the provisions of this Part, to the extent that funds are
available therefor.
C. Except as otherwise provided in this Part, the provisions of Chapter
13 of Title 49 of the Louisiana Revised Statutes of 1950 apply to the
administration and enforcement of this Part.
D. The residential subcommittee or its authorized representatives may
enter any place, establishment, or location where manufactured or modular
homes are manufactured, sold, offered for sale, transported, or installed for the
purpose of ascertaining whether the requirements of the manufactured housing
code or the modular housing code and of this Part and Part II-A of this
Chapter, and the rules and regulations of the residential subcommittee, have
Page 22 of 48
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 398 ENROLLED
been or are being complied with.
§2176.10. Agent for service of process
Any person licensed by the residential subcommittee who is domiciled
outside of this state and does not maintain a place of business in this state shall
appoint a registered agent with the Louisiana secretary of state to serve as his
agent for service of process in any action or proceeding arising from the
licensee’s business activities.
§2176.11. Suit by residential subcommittee for violations; venue; relief
obtainable
A. If it appears that a person is violating or is attempting to violate the
manufactured housing code, the modular housing code, or a provision of this
Part, Part II-A of this Chapter, or any rule or regulation adopted and
promulgated by the residential subcommittee in accordance with the
Administrative Procedure Act, the residential subcommittee shall bring suit to
restrain that person from continuing the violation or from carrying out the
threat.
B. Venue for a suit pursuant to this Section lies in the Nineteenth Judicial
District Court.
C. In the suit, the residential subcommittee may obtain injunctions,
prohibitory and mandatory, including temporary restraining orders and
preliminary injunctions, as the facts warrant, including, when appropriate,
injunctions restraining a person from moving or disposing of a manufactured
home that is subject to the requirements of this Part, Part II-A of this Chapter,
or any rule or regulation adopted and promulgated by the residential
subcommittee in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act, or to
restrain a person from engaging in any business for which a license has been or
should be issued pursuant to this Part or Part II-A of this Chapter. Any such
manufactured home may, in the court's discretion, be ordered impounded or
placed under the control of an agent appointed by the court.
D. All costs incurred by the residential subcommittee, including
Page 23 of 48
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 398 ENROLLED
reasonable attorney fees, may be borne by the person or licensee who has been
enjoined, or found in violation of the provisions of the manufactured housing
code, the modular housing code, or any provision of this Part, or Part II-A of
this Chapter, or any rule or regulation adopted and promulgated by the
residential subcommittee in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act.
§2176.12. Hearings to investigate and determine violations; orders prohibiting
violations and requiring compliance
A. If in the opinion of the residential subcommittee the manufactured
housing code, the modular housing code, or the requirements of this Part or
Part II-A of this Chapter is being violated, it may conduct hearings to
investigate and determine whether the violation has occurred or is occurring
and may issue orders prohibiting such violation and requiring compliance with
the manufactured housing code or the modular housing code and the provisions
of this Part or Part II-A of this Chapter.
B. All costs incurred by the residential subcommittee, including
reasonable attorney fees, may be borne by the person or licensee who has been
found in violation of the provisions of the manufactured housing code, the
modular housing code, any provision of this Part, Part II-A of this Chapter, or
any rule or regulation adopted and promulgated by the residential
subcommittee in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act.
§2176.13. Suspension or revocation of licenses for violation
After prior notice and hearing, the residential subcommittee may
suspend or revoke the license of any manufactured or modular home licensee
licensed pursuant to the provisions of this Part or Part II-A of this Chapter for
violations of the manufactured housing code, the modular housing code, or any
provision of this Part or Part II-A of this Chapter. The notice, hearing, and
actions as prescribed in this Section shall be governed by the provisions of
Chapter 13 of Title 49 of the Louisiana Revised Statutes of 1950, and
particularly R.S. 49:977.3(C) relative to emergency action.
§2176.14. Penalties for violations
Page 24 of 48
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 398 ENROLLED
A. Whoever is found guilty of violating the manufactured housing code,
the modular housing code, any provision of this Part, Part II-A of this Chapter,
any rule or regulation, or final order issued thereunder is liable to the state
through the residential subcommittee for a civil penalty not in excess of two
thousand five hundred dollars for each violation. If the residential
subcommittee determines a violation was intentional or the violator is a habitual
offender, the residential subcommittee may double the civil penalty up to five
thousand dollars for each violation. Each violation constitutes a separate
violation with respect to each manufactured or modular home, or with respect
to each failure or refusal to allow or perform an act required thereby, except
that the maximum civil penalty shall not exceed one million dollars for any
related series of violations occurring within one year from the date of the first
violation.
B. Any individual or director, officer, or agent of a corporation who
knowingly and willingly violates any provision of the manufactured housing
code, the modular housing code, any provision of this Part, Part II-A of this
Chapter, or any applicable rule or regulation issued pursuant to those codes or
those Parts in a manner which threatens the health and safety of any purchaser
shall be fined not more than one thousand dollars or imprisoned not more than
six months, or both.
§2176.15. Maintenance of records; reports required
Each licensee shall establish and maintain such records, make such
reports, and provide such information as the residential subcommittee may
reasonably require in order to be able to determine whether that licensee has
acted or is acting in compliance with the manufactured housing code or the
modular housing code and any provision of this Part, Part II-A of this Chapter,
or any rule or regulation adopted by the residential subcommittee. Upon
request of the residential subcommittee, each licensee shall permit the
residential subcommittee or its representative to inspect appropriate books,
papers, records, and documents relevant to determining whether the licensee
Page 25 of 48
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 398 ENROLLED
has acted or is acting in compliance with the provisions of this Part, Part II-A
of this Chapter, or any rule, as well as any regulation or order issued
thereunder.
§2176.16. Down payments; sale of manufactured housing
It is unlawful for a factory-built housing dealer or factory-built housing
developer to set forth in any retail installment sales contract, chattel mortgage,
or security agreement any down payment unless all of the down payment has
actually been received by the factory-built housing dealer or factory-built
housing developer at the time of execution of such document. If any part of the
down payment is represented by a loan, trade-in, or any consideration other
than cash, this fact shall be expressly set forth on the retail installment sales
contract, chattel mortgage, or security agreement. No amount of the cash down
payment shall be from any rebate or other consideration received by or to be
given to the consumer from the factory-built housing dealer or factory-built
housing developer, or his respective agent.
§2176.17. Use of model manufactured and modular homes
A. Notwithstanding the provisions of R.S. 40:1730.21 et seq. and 1730.51
et seq. to the contrary, a licensed factory-built housing dealer or factory-built
housing developer may use a manufactured and modular home model to
conduct only manufactured and modular home sales-related activity at the
location of sales of manufactured and modular homes. Manufactured and
modular home sales-related activity includes but is not limited to executing
contracts, making copies or phone calls, showing manufactured and modular
home models, or engaging in any other sales-related activity.
B. The licensed factory-built housing dealer or factory-built housing
developer shall also adhere to all of the following requirements:
(1) There shall be no overnight sleeping in the manufactured or modular
home.
(2) The manufactured or modular home shall be properly installed in
accordance with applicable federal and state statutes, rules, regulations, and
Page 26 of 48
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 398 ENROLLED
codes.
§2176.18. Severability
If any provision of this Part or the application of any provision of this
Part is held invalid, that invalidity shall not affect other provisions, items, or
applications of this Part that may be given effect without the invalid provision,
item, or application and to this end the provisions of this Part are severable.
§2176.19. Supremacy of the Part
Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the codes and
standards referenced in R.S. 37:2177.1 et seq., and those adopted by the
residential subcommittee, are the only construction and installation standards
used for manufactured or modular housing in this state, and these standards
preempt all local standards as they relate to the construction and installation of
manufactured or modular homes in this state.
PART II-A NEW MANUFACTURED AND MODULAR
HOME WARRANTIES
§2177.1. Purpose
The legislature finds a need to promote commerce in this state by
providing clear, concise, and mandatory warranties for the purchasers and
occupants of new manufactured and modular homes in this state and by
providing for the use of homeowners' insurance as additional protection for the
public against defects in the construction of new manufactured and modular
homes. This need can be met by providing a warranty for a new manufactured
or modular home purchaser defining the responsibility of the builders to that
purchaser and subsequent purchasers during the warranty periods provided
herein. The warranty, which is mandatory in most cases, shall promote
uniformity of defined building standards. Additionally, all provisions of this
Part shall apply to any defect, even if there is no building standard directly
regulating the defective workmanship or materials.
§2177.2. Short title
This Part shall be known and may be cited as the "New Manufactured
Page 27 of 48
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 398 ENROLLED
and Modular Home Warranty Act".
§2177.3. Definitions
For purposes of this Part, the following words, phrases, and terms are
defined and construed as follows:
(1) "Builder" means the factory-built housing dealer or developer who
sold the home, the manufacturer who constructed the home or any section of the
home if it is a multi-section home, the installer who installed the home, any
person or entity that designed, manufactured, or constructed the home, whether
or not the consumer purchased the underlying real estate with the home or the
builder initially occupied the home as his residence, or any person or entity
licensed by the residential subcommittee.
(2)(a) "Building standards" for manufactured housing means the
National Manufactured Home Construction and Safety Standards Act of 1974,
42 U.S.C. 5401 et seq., as amended, and federal regulations promulgated
pursuant to those provisions, along with any construction or installation-related
standards adopted by the Louisiana Manufactured Housing Commission or its
successor the residential subcommittee, together with any additional
performance standards, if any, which the builder may undertake to be in
compliance.
(b) "Building standards" for modular housing means the International
Residential Code as adopted by the Louisiana State Uniform Construction Code
Council.
(3) "Home" means a manufactured home or modular home as defined
in R.S. 37:2150.1.
(4) "Initial purchaser" means any person for whom a home is built or
the first person to whom a home is sold upon completion of construction.
(5) "Major structural defect" means any actual physical damage to any
of the following designated, load-bearing portions of a home caused by failure
of the load-bearing portions which affects their load-bearing functions to the
extent the home becomes unsafe, unsanitary, or is otherwise unlivable:
Page 28 of 48
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 398 ENROLLED
(a) Foundation systems and footings.
(b) Beams.
(c) Girders.
(d) Lintels.
(e) Columns.
(f) Walls and partitions.
(g) Floor systems.
(h) Roof framing systems.
(6) "Owner" means the initial purchaser of a home and any of his
successors in title, heirs, invitees, or assigns to a home during the time the
warranties provided pursuant to this Part are in effect.
(7) "Warranty commencement date" means the date that legal title to a
home is conveyed to its initial purchaser or the date the home is first occupied,
whichever occurs first.
§2177.4. Warranties; exclusions
A. Subject to the exclusions provided in Subsection B of this Section,
every builder warrants all of the following to the owner:
(1) One year following the warranty commencement date, the home will
be free from any defect due to noncompliance with the building standards or
due to other defects in materials or workmanship not regulated by building
standards.
(2) Two years following the warranty commencement date, the
plumbing, electrical, heating, cooling, and ventilating systems exclusive of any
appliance, fixture, and equipment will be free from any defect due to
noncompliance with the building standards or due to other defects in materials
or workmanship not regulated by building standards.
(3) Five years following the warranty commencement date, the home will
be free from major structural defects due to noncompliance with the building
standards or due to other defects in materials or workmanship not regulated by
building standards.
Page 29 of 48
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 398 ENROLLED
B. Unless the parties otherwise agree in writing, the builder's warranty
shall exclude all of the following items:
(1) Fences, landscaping, including but not limited to sodding, seeding,
shrubs, existing and new trees, and plantings, as well as off-site improvements,
all driveways and walkways, or any other improvement not a part of the home
itself.
(2) After the first year, the concrete floor of a basement and the concrete
floor of an attached or unattached garage that is built separate from a
foundation wall or other structural element of the home.
(3) Damage to real property which is not part of the home covered by the
warranty and which is not included in the purchase price of the home.
(4) Any damage to the extent it is caused or made worse by any of the
following:
(a) Negligence, improper maintenance, neglect, or improper operation
by anyone other than the builder or any employee, agent, or subcontractor of
the builder.
(b) Failure by anyone other than the builder or any employee, agent, or
subcontractor of the builder to comply with the warranty requirements of
manufacturers of appliances, equipment, or fixtures. This includes the owner
or any occupant of the home prohibiting the builder or any employee, agent, or
subcontractor of the builder from making timely repairs as required under law
and warranty.
(c) Failure by the owner to give written notice by registered or certified
mail to the residential subcommittee of any defect within the time set forth in
this Section; however, the provisions of this Subparagraph shall not be
construed to change either the warranty periods enumerated in Subsection A
of this Section or the notice requirements provided by this Section.
(d) Any change of the grading of the ground by anyone other than the
builder, or any employee, agent, or subcontractor of the builder.
(e) Any change, alteration, or addition made to the home by anyone after
Page 30 of 48
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 398 ENROLLED
the initial occupancy by the owner, except any change, alteration, or addition
performed by the builder or any employee, agent, or subcontractor of the
builder.
(f) Dampness, condensation, or other damage due to the failure of the
owner to maintain adequate ventilation or drainage.
(5) Any loss or damage which the owner has not taken timely action to
minimize.
(6) Any defect in, or any defect caused by, materials or work supplied by
anyone other than the builder or any employee, agent, or subcontractor of the
builder.
(7) Normal wear and tear or normal deterioration.
(8) Loss or damage which does not constitute a defect in the construction
of the home by the builder or any employee, agent, or subcontractor of the
builder.
(9) Loss or damage resulting from war, accident, riot and civil
commotion, water escape, falling objects, aircraft, vehicles, acts of God,
lightning, windstorm, hail, flood, mudslide, earthquake, volcanic eruption,
wind-driven water, and changes in the level of the underground water table
which are not reasonably foreseeable.
(10) Any damage caused by soil movement which is covered by other
insurance.
(11) Insect damage.
(12) Any loss or damage which arises while the home is being used
primarily for a nonresidential purpose.
(13) Any condition which does not result in actual physical damage to the
home.
(14) Bodily injury or damage to personal property.
(15) Any cost of shelter, transportation, food, moving, storage, or other
incidental expense related to relocation during repair.
(16) Any defect not reported in writing by registered or certified mail to
Page 31 of 48
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 398 ENROLLED
the residential subcommittee or insurance company, as appropriate, prior to the
expiration of the period specified in Subsection A of this Section for such defect
plus thirty days.
(17) Consequential damages.
(18) Any loss or damage to a home caused by soil conditions or soil
movement if the home is constructed on land owned by the initial purchaser and
the builder obtains a written waiver from the initial purchaser for any loss or
damage caused by soil conditions or soil movement.
(19) Mold and mold damage.
C. The provisions of Subsection A of this Section establish minimum
required warranties and shall not be waived by the owner or reduced by the
builder provided the home is a single- or multiple-family dwelling to be
occupied by an owner as his home.
§2177.5. Required notice
A. Before undertaking any repair himself or instituting any action for
breach of warranty, the owner shall give the residential subcommittee written
notice on each individual home that is defective by filling out the consumer
complaint form provided by the residential subcommittee and submitting it by
registered or certified mail within one year after knowledge of the defect,
advising the residential subcommittee of all defects in the individual home. The
residential subcommittee shall then have the individual home inspected and a
determination made on all defects listed by the owner. Thereafter, the
residential subcommittee shall give the appropriate builder a reasonable
opportunity to comply with the provisions of this Part. Once the repairs are
made, the residential subcommittee shall have the home reinspected to
determine if the repairs have been made in compliance with the building
standards.
B. The factory-built housing dealer or developer licensee shall give the
owner written notice of the requirements of this Part at the time of the closing
between the factory-built housing dealer or developer and the owner, or if there
Page 32 of 48
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 398 ENROLLED
is no such closing, at the time of the execution of the purchase agreement
between the factory-built housing dealer or developer and the owner. The
residential subcommittee shall adopt and promulgate rules and regulations in
accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act to implement the provisions
of this Subsection.
§2177.6. Peremption
Any action to enforce any warranty provided in this Part shall be subject
to a peremptive period of thirty days after the expiration of the appropriate
time period provided in R.S. 37:2177.4.
§2177.7. Insurance
All or part of the builder's obligation pursuant to any warranty required
in this Part may be insured by the builder for the benefit of the purchaser
through an insurance company authorized to transact business in this state.
§2177.8. Transfer of warranty and insurance
Any warranty imposed pursuant to this Part and any insurance benefit
shall automatically transfer without charge to a subsequent owner who acquires
title to the home. Any transfer of the home shall not extend the duration of any
warranty or insurance coverage.
§2177.9. Violations; limitations
A. If a builder violates this Part by failing to perform as required by the
warranties provided in this Part, any affected owner shall have a cause of action
against the builder for actual damages, including attorney fees and court costs,
arising out of the violation. The damages with respect to a single defect shall not
exceed the reasonable cost of repair or replacement necessary to cure the defect,
and damages with respect to all defects in the home shall not exceed the original
purchase price of the home.
B. The parties may provide for the arbitration of any claim in dispute.
Any arbitration shall comply with and may be binding only to the extent
provided for in R.S. 9:4201 et seq.
§2177.10. Exclusiveness
Page 33 of 48
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 398 ENROLLED
This Part provides the exclusive remedies, warranties, and peremptive
periods as between the builders and owner relative to the construction of homes
as defined in this Part, and no other provisions of law relative to warranties and
redhibitory vices and defects shall apply. Nothing herein shall be construed as
affecting or limiting any warranty of title to land or improvements.
PART III. MINIMUM STANDARDS FOR INSTALLATION
OF MANUFACTURED AND MODULAR HOMES AND
TRANSPORTATION REQUIREMENTS
§2177.21. Definitions
For the purposes of this Part, the following words have the following
meanings:
(1) "Frame tie" or "tie down" means any device approved and used for
the purpose of securing manufactured or modular homes to ground anchors in
order to resist wind forces.
(2) "Ground anchor" means any device approved and used for the
purpose of securing manufactured or modular homes to the ground in order to
resist wind forces.
(3) "Ground level" means an anchor that has been fully installed so the
head is at the surface of the soil.
(4) "Installation permit" means a permit issued by the residential
subcommittee to a licensed installer or the homeowner who shall certify that the
home is in compliance with this Part.
(5) "Installation permit sticker" means a sticker issued by the residential
subcommittee, along with an installation permit, which is to be affixed to the
home to signify that the home is in compliance with this Part.
(6) "Installer" means a person licensed by the board to install a
manufactured or modular home.
(7) "Over-roof tie" means a certain device approved by the
manufactured homes manufacturer and used for the purpose of securing the
manufactured homes systems to ground anchors in order to resist wind forces.
Page 34 of 48
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 398 ENROLLED
Ties may be installed only under roof material.
(8) "Setup" or "installation" means the operations performed at the
occupancy site which render manufactured and modular homes fit for
habitation. Such operations include but are not limited to positioning, blocking,
leveling, supporting, tying down, making minor adjustments and trim out, and
assembling multiple or expandable units in the final construction process.
(9) "Stabilizer device" means an approved device or method that is used
to resist lateral movement of manufactured homes and anchors.
(10) "Transporter" means an individual who transports a manufactured
or modular home to the site of installation but does not perform any blocking
or anchoring of the home, however, a transporter is allowed to put blocks under
the hitch on the tongue of the frame.
§2177.22. Installation standards for manufactured and modular homes
All manufactured and modular homes shall be installed to meet the
following standards, unless otherwise specified in this Part:
(1) Installation standards for the setup of new manufactured homes shall
comply with the manufacturer's installation instructions. Installation for the
setup of new or used modular homes shall comply with the International
Residential Code enforced by the local authority having jurisdiction.
(2) Installation standards for the setup of used manufactured homes shall
comply with the manufacturer's installation instructions, if available. In the
absence of the manufacturer's installation instructions, used manufactured
homes shall comply with the provisions of this Part.
(3) All anchors, piers, and tie-down components used in the installation
of manufactured homes shall be tested and meet the minimum industry
standards. Installation of such anchors and components shall be in accordance
with the manufacturer's instructions.
(4) As to site preparation, the under-home grade, or ground, shall be
cleaned of all vegetation and organic material, such as stumps, roots, or similar
material, except grass not exceeding three inches in height. The area beneath
Page 35 of 48
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 398 ENROLLED
and around the home shall be crowned, sloped or properly drained so that
water will not flow or accumulate under the home. All grass and organic
material shall be removed and the pier foundation placed on stable soil or
compacted fill. When the soil compaction or soil-bearing capacity is not known,
the local building authority in the locale may be consulted or a reading by the
use of a pocket penetrometer may be obtained. The bottom of the footer or
footers shall be placed on stable soil. The pier foundation shall be a minimum
of three and one-half inches by sixteen inches by sixteen inches solid concrete
pad or equivalent, precast or poured in place, or approved material by the
regulatory agency. The regulatory agency, or its duly authorized
representatives, shall cause products to be analyzed or tested to require that the
pier foundation products have a deflection of not more than three-eighths inch
under design load. Such testing may be conducted by an independent third
party qualified and approved by the agency. Previous testing data submitted in
other jurisdictions may be considered by the agency. Where the manufacturer's
specifications have additional requirements other than the above, the more
stringent shall apply. The landowner is responsible for proper site preparation
in accordance with this Paragraph.
(5) All manufactured homes shall be anchored with an approved anchor
system. All auger systems shall be installed to a minimum depth of thirty inches,
or two and one-half feet, in undisturbed or compacted soil. Piers are to be
installed off center of the anchors so as not to interfere with the proper
alignment of the strapping. Anchors may be installed in predrilled holes,
provided the anchor penetrates a minimum of two feet into undisturbed soil
beyond the predrilled hole. When the anchor manufacturer's installation
instructions permit, the hole is then backfilled with soil compacted in layers not
exceeding six inches. For manufactured homes produced after July 13, 1994, the
installer shall refer to the manufacturer's setup manual for the ultimate load
requirements for anchors at the different tie points on the manufactured home.
For used manufactured homes when the manufacturer's setup manual is not
Page 36 of 48
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 398 ENROLLED
available, all anchor points at side walls, shear walls, end walls, centerline, and
other points as identified by the manufacturer, shall be certified for an ultimate
load of four thousand seven hundred twenty-five pounds. Anchors are required
one at each end of shear walls; one on each end of each I-beam; one frame tie
at each vertical tie point; one in each end of each marriage wall, centerline; and
on each ridge beam support post.
(6) Frame tie ground anchors shall have approved stabilizing devices
installed on the inside, in the direction of pull, with the top of the stabilizing
plate driven flush with the soil unless otherwise specified by the manufacturer's
guidelines.
(7) Piers or load-bearing supports or devices shall be installed and
constructed to evenly distribute the loads. Steel piers with mechanical
adjustments shall be securely attached to the frame of all manufactured homes.
Manufactured load-bearing supports or devices shall be listed and approved for
the use intended, or piers shall be constructed as outlined in this Part. Concrete
products shall comply with the minimum dimensional and structural
requirements for load-bearing. Solid and cell concrete blocks shall be to the
standard specification for load-bearing concrete masonry units, ASTM C-90,
1993 Edition. Poured concrete shall be a minimum of FCL = 2500 PSI. All
plastic products shall be conditioned at ASTM D 618-61, reapproved 1990,
standard practice for conditioning plastics and electrical insulating materials
for testing. Plastics shall be tested to the ASTM D 790-92 standard test methods
for flexural properties or unreinforced and reinforced plastics and electrical
insulating materials, ASTM D 732-85 standard test method for shear strength
or plastics by punch tool, and ASTM G 53-88 standard practice for operating
light and water exposure apparatus for exposure of nonmetallic materials.
(8)(a) In flood-prone areas, the foundation shall comply with the
requirements set forth in the manual, Manufactured Home Installation In Flood
Hazard Areas, published by the Federal Emergency Management Agency
(FEMA). Nothing in this Paragraph shall be construed to prohibit state or local
Page 37 of 48
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 398 ENROLLED
jurisdictions from adopting more stringent elevation or freeboard requirements
than those contained in the FEMA manual, consistent with Subparagraph (b)
of this Paragraph.
(b) For all manufactured and modular home installations in this state,
the state and political subdivisions may adopt laws, rules, ordinances, building
codes, or other measures to regulate installations that include additional
freeboard requirements beyond the minimum standards adopted by the
National Flood Insurance Program, 42 U.S.C. 4011 et seq., in order to
incentivize going above the minimum floodplain management standards.
Freeboard requirements shall be uniformly applied based on the Base Flood
Elevation established in the currently adopted Flood Insurance Rate Map for
the jurisdiction and shall not vary based on alternative or superseded mapping
sources.
(c) All applications submitted to and permits issued by a jurisdiction's
permit office shall include the Base Flood Elevation at the permitted site and the
required finished floor elevation, including any applicable freeboard.
(9) The marriage line on all multisectional homes shall be sealed with
industry-approved materials at the ceiling line, the floor line, and the end walls
to restrict any air infiltration into the home.
§2177.23. Foundations and piers
The following guidelines shall be used when the installation of
foundations and piers is not specified in the manufacturer's instructions or
when the manufacturer's installation instructions are not available:
(1) Piers:
(a) Piers shall be centered under the I-beam and installed as provided by
rules promulgated by the residential subcommittee. The first pier shall be
within two feet of either end of the home. The pier foundation shall be a
minimum of three and one-half inches by sixteen inches by sixteen inches solid
concrete pad precast or poured in place, or other pad meeting the two thousand
five hundred pounds per square inch rating, or other approved material.
Page 38 of 48
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 398 ENROLLED
(b) Piers may be constructed of regular eight inches by eight inches by
sixteen inches concrete blocks, open cells, solid (minimum eight inches by ten
inches top), centered on the footing or foundation. A one inch or two inch by
eight inch by sixteen inch treated or hardwood plate, or other approved
material shall completely cover the top of the pier with shims, one-fourth inch
minimum and one and one-half inch maximum, centered and driven tight from
both sides of the I-beam between the wood plate or cap and the main frame.
Single-tiered block piers shall be installed perpendicular to the main I-beam.
However, when a pier has been capped with at least a four inch (three and one-
half inch) solid concrete block or other approved material, one-fourth inch of
wood stock or wood shims shall be installed between the pier and steel I-beam.
(c) Center line piers shall be located at each end of center line and shall
be located on each end of the opening within six inches of jamb studs or ridge
beam posts where openings four feet wide or greater occur. Any openings four
feet or larger in the exterior sidewall or marriage wall shall require blocking at
each end of the opening with four inch by sixteen inch by sixteen inch pads.
Piers shall also be installed on each side of any perimeter door or fireplace. Bay
windows or any opening forty-eight inches or more shall require blocking at
each end. Fourteen feet or wider units with an I-beam spread of less than
eighty-two inches and twelve feet wide units with an I-beam spread of less than
seventy-five and one-half inches shall have perimeter blocking installed at a
minimum of eight feet on center. Piers shall not be required under the clear,
open, spans between ridge beam posts.
(d) All piers over thirty-six inches and corners over twenty-four inches
in height shall be double tiered with blocks interlocked and capped with two
four inch by eight inch by sixteen inch solid concrete blocks side by side and
perpendicular to the I-beam, or other approved material and cushioned with
wood shims or treated plate. Pier height is measured from the top of the footer
or foundation to the top of the cement block stack, including four inch cap
blocks.
Page 39 of 48
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 398 ENROLLED
(e) All piers over fifty-two inches shall be designed by an architect or
engineer.
(f) Metal or precast support piers shall be installed on a base or footer
of a minimum size of four inches by eight inches by sixteen inches of solid
concrete or other approved material.
(g) Metal or precast support piers shall be restricted to a maximum of
two inch locking mechanical height adjustment and shall be restricted to a
maximum height of not more than twenty-four inches measured from the
ground base or footer. This twenty-four inch maximum shall not include the two
inch mechanical extension or adjustment. However, center line or perimeter
supports are permitted to exceed the twenty-four inch maximum.
(h) The minimum distance between the finished grade under the
manufactured home and the bottom of the I-beam shall be twelve inches.
(2) Foundations:
(a) Concrete, precast, sand and gravel pads or foundations shall be a
minimum of two thousand five hundred pounds per square inch.
(b) Plastic pads or foundations shall be tested in the lower fifty percent
of each soil class (1,000-1,500 PSF soil type).
§2177.24. Installation standards for anchors and tie-downs
The following specifications are standards set for used manufactured
homes when manufacturer's installation instructions and specifications are not
available:
(1) Anchors:
(a) All auger anchors shall be a minimum of thirty inches in height.
(b) All anchors shall be tested to an ultimate load of four thousand seven
hundred twenty-five pounds.
(2) Frame ties:
(a) Used units where the manufacturer's specifications are not available
shall be anchored every ten feet in Zone I, eight feet in Zone II, and six feet in
Zone III, with anchors placed within two feet of each end.
Page 40 of 48
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 398 ENROLLED
(b) Frame ties shall make at least one complete wrap around the chassis
or frame and shall be looped from the top of the I-beam to the anchor. However,
some frame tie straps may have to extend from the bottom of the I-beam or the
I-beam on the opposite side to assure the proper angle due to the height of the
home.
(c) Each frame tie shall be installed to the component manufacturer's
instructions.
(d) All frame ties shall be secured to one of the main steel I-beams that
run the length of the home.
(3) Marriage wall or centerline ridge beam column ties, shear wall ties,
and frames ties:
(a) Multiple section homes are to be secured at the centerline with straps
or cables to the specifications in the manufacturer's manual or at the locations
designated on the home.
(b) Used multiple section homes shall have anchors installed at all
factory-installed anchor strap connections, including ridge beam column straps,
shear wall straps or attachments, or other locations designated by the
manufacturer.
(4) Multiple section homes shall be mechanically fastened every twenty-
four inches at the bottom, end walls, and roof. A minimum thirty-gauge, eight-
inch-wide, galvanized strip shall be centered over the peak and fastened with
galvanized roofing nails at two inches on center at both sides of center line.
§2177.25. Installation standards for used manufactured homes in hurricane
zones
When the manufacturer's printed setup requirements are not available
for the applicable wind zone, the following guidelines are to be used:
(1) All anchors shall be listed for four thousand seven hundred twenty-
five pounds ultimate load.
(2) Longitudinal ties only are required at each end of each unit. The
minimum number of ties at a minimum angle of forty-five degrees from vertical
Page 41 of 48
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 398 ENROLLED
is three each for Zone II and four each for Zone III.
(3) All designated tie points on the perimeter side walls shall be equipped
with vertical and diagonal ties with stabilizer devices. When tie points are not
designated on the side walls, diagonal ties with stabilizer devices shall be spaced
a maximum of ten feet for Zone I, eight feet for Zone II, and six feet six inches
for Zone III.
(4) Anchors and support piers shall be installed at the center line of each
opening over five feet. Support piers shall be installed on each end of the
marriage wall and at other locations that may be identified on the marriage
wall.
(5) A shear wall interior partition wall which attaches to the side wall
and is thirty-six inches or longer shall have vertical ties and support piers
installed at each end.
(6) All foundations and piers shall comply with the requirements of this
Part.
(7) Multiple section homes shall be mechanically fastened every twenty-
four inches at the bottom, end walls, and roof.
(8) A minimum thirty gauge, eight inch wide, galvanized strip shall be
centered over the peak and fastened with galvanized roofing nails at two inches
on center at both sides of center line.
§2177.26. Local installation standards preempted
The manufactured and modular home installation standards provided
for in this Part shall preempt all local installation standards.
§2177.27. Licensure of installers and transporters; adoption of rules;
compliance with installation instructions; disposition of fees;
continuing education; bond
A.(1) The residential subcommittee shall, by rule adopted in accordance
with the Administrative Procedure Act, provide for the licensure of installers
and transporters of manufactured and modular homes and the implementation
and collection of an annual license fee and an installation permit sticker fee. The
Page 42 of 48
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 398 ENROLLED
installer's and transporter's license fee is one hundred twenty-five dollars per
license, and the installation permit sticker fee is twenty dollars. A licensed
installer is allowed to perform the functions of a transporter without having to
obtain that license.
(2) After January 1, 2004, prior to receiving an original license, installers
shall attend a certification course offered by the residential subcommittee or a
residential subcommittee-approved provider and pass an accompanying test.
The fee for any course offered by the residential subcommittee shall be set by
rule and shall not exceed one hundred dollars.
(3) Installers are required to take one continuing education course per
year. The individual required to take the continuing education course is the
individual license holder. For corporations, an officer or manager of the
corporation shall take the course. For partnerships, a partner shall take the
course. The residential subcommittee shall set the educational requirements and
approve educational course providers and the course materials for all
continuing education classes. The residential subcommittee may suspend these
continuing education requirements, for one or more licenses, if the residential
subcommittee, in its discretion, determines that action is warranted due to
extraordinary circumstances.
(4) All installers and transporters shall provide annually along with the
license application a surety bond in the amount of twenty-five thousand dollars
or post a twenty-five thousand dollar irrevocable letter of credit with the
residential subcommittee.
B. It is unlawful for any person, other than the homeowner or a licensed
installer, to perform an installation of a manufactured or modular home,
whether or not that person receives compensation for that action. For the
purposes of this Subsection, community owners or park operators of
manufactured or modular homes shall not be considered homeowners if the
home in question is or will be leased at any time.
C. Any installer or homeowner installing a manufactured or modular
Page 43 of 48
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 398 ENROLLED
home in this state shall first obtain an installation permit sticker from the
residential subcommittee which shall be affixed to the side of the home at the
point where electrical power is connected to the home. All installation permit
stickers shall be affixed within ten days of delivery of the manufactured or
modular home, unless extenuating circumstances are shown.
D. Any installation of a manufactured or modular home in this state shall
be performed in strict compliance with this Part.
E. All fees collected pursuant to Subsection A of this Section or fines
collected pursuant to this Part shall be used exclusively for the maintenance and
operation of manufactured housing issues by the residential subcommittee.
§2177.28. Violations; penalties
A. Any installer, transporter, or other person who performs any work
described in this Part without the appropriate license or who installs a
manufactured or modular home in a manner contrary to the requirements of
this Part is in violation of the provisions of this Part. Any such violator is
subject to the penalty of revocation or suspension of his license or a civil fine of
up to two thousand five hundred dollars, or both, for each violation. If the
residential subcommittee determines a violation was intentional or the violator
is a habitual offender, then the residential subcommittee may double the civil
penalty up to five thousand dollars for each violation. Violators shall also be
subject to any measures prescribed by any other applicable rule, regulation, or
law.
B. Multiple installation violations of this Part occurring in a single
installation constitutes one violation. Each installation performed in violation
of this Part constitutes a separate violation.
§2177.29. Administration and enforcement; powers of residential subcommittee
The residential subcommittee may adopt, pursuant to the Administrative
Procedure Act, such rules and regulations as are necessary for the
administration and enforcement of this Part.
§2177.30. Mobile homes not covered
Page 44 of 48
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 398 ENROLLED
The provisions of this Part do not apply to the installation and setup of
mobile homes in Louisiana.
PART IV. MANUFACTURED HOUSING STATE
ADMINISTRATIVE AGENCY
§2177.51. Definitions
As used in this Part, the following definitions shall apply:
(1) "Louisiana state plan" means the document which outlines the
process by which the state administrative agent shall ensure the effective
handling of consumer complaints and other information that relates to
noncompliance, defects, or imminent safety hazards, involving manufactured
housing, together with any responsibility delegated to the state administrative
agent.
(2) "State administrative agency" means the board.
(3) "State administrative agent" or "agent" means the executive director
of the board.
§2177.52. Louisiana state administrative agent
A. The agent is vested with the powers and authority necessary and
proper to enable the agent to fully and effectively carry out and enforce the
provisions and objectives of the Louisiana state plan administered on behalf of
the United States Department of Housing and Urban Development, hereafter
referred to as "HUD". The agent is authorized and empowered to adopt and
promulgate all reasonable rules and regulations to accomplish the objectives of
the Louisiana state plan. The enumeration of any power or authority in this
Part shall not be construed to deny, impair, disparage, or limit any others
necessary to the attainment of these provisions and objectives. All rules and
regulations shall be adopted in accordance with the provisions of the
Administrative Procedure Act. Oversight review shall be conducted by the
House Committee on Commerce and the Senate Committee on Commerce,
Consumer Protection and International Affairs.
B. The power and authority of the agent includes but is not limited to the
Page 45 of 48
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 398 ENROLLED
following:
(1) Working with manufactured home consumers, manufacturers,
factory-built housing dealers, factory-built housing developers, salesmen, and
installers to hear consumer complaints and other information relating to
noncompliance, defects, or imminent safety hazards in accordance with 24 CFR
Part 3282, Subpart I. The agent or residential subcommittee may make final
determinations regarding consumer complaints.
(2) The right to enter at a reasonable time and inspect all factories,
warehouses, or establishments in this state in which manufactured homes are
manufactured.
(3) Establishing necessary notification and corrective procedures
pursuant to 24 CFR Part 3282, Subpart I.
(4) Providing oversight as prescribed by law of remedial actions carried
out by manufacturers and a manufacturer's handling of consumer complaints.
(5) Establishing a monitoring inspection fee in accordance with the
guidelines established by the secretary of the United States Department of
Housing and Urban Development and providing for participation in the federal
fee distribution system.
§2177.53. Administrative and enforcement of the state plan; powers;
applicability
A. The agent is charged with the adoption, administration, and
enforcement of the state plan, pursuant to the federal standards enforcement
program and any other rules and regulations necessary for the administration
and enforcement of the state plan. The standards adopted shall conform to the
standards promulgated pursuant to 24 CFR Part 3280 and 24 CFR Part 3282.
The agent shall discharge this duty consistent with the rules and regulations
promulgated by the United States Department of Housing and Urban
Development.
B. The agent may adopt, pursuant to the Administrative Procedure Act,
such rules and regulations as are necessary to enforce the standards
Page 46 of 48
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 398 ENROLLED
promulgated pursuant to the state plan and any other rules and regulations
necessary for the administration and enforcement of the state plan not
inconsistent with the provisions of the federal standards enforcement program.
C. Except as otherwise provided for in this Part, the provisions of
Chapter 13 of Title 49 of the Louisiana Revised Statutes of 1950 apply to the
administration and enforcement of this Part.
* * *
Section 2. R.S. 40:1730.23(B) is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§1730.23. Enforcement of building codes by municipalities and parishes
* * *
B.(1) Nothing in this Part shall conflict with the Federal United States
Department of Housing and Urban Development's regulations regarding
manufactured housing construction or the provisions of R.S. 51:912.21 et seq. R.S.
37:2177.21 et seq., as it relates to manufactured housing installation. Further, it is
the intent of the legislature that any service, renovation, repair, or warranty work
performed on a manufactured home shall be handled under pursuant to the
appropriate federal standards governing manufactured housing construction or state
standards governing installation, and all such work be under the jurisdiction of the
Louisiana Manufactured Housing Residential subcommittee. Additionally, the
exemption for manufactured housing provided for in this Subsection shall extend to
and include driveways, steps, decks, or other similar accessory structures or work,
but shall not include any additional living area or other type of heated and cooled
space outside of the original footprint of the manufactured home.
(2) All municipalities and parishes shall inspect the installation and setup
of manufactured and modular homes within their jurisdiction.
(3) All municipalities, parishes, or factory-built housing licensees, shall
use a building code enforcement officer, third-party provider, or third-party
provider contracted by a jurisdiction, that is certified to conduct inspections
using the United States Department of Housing and Urban Development's
construction standards for manufactured homes.
Page 47 of 48
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 398 ENROLLED
(4) If there is a dispute as to the interpretation of the federal or state
construction standards, by any code enforcement officer or third-party provider
or licensee, the residential subcommittee shall issue a ruling as to the proper
interpretation of the consultation with the United States Department of Housing
and Urban Development construction standards expert. The residential
subcommittee's decision shall be final and binding on all parties.
(5) The residential subcommittee shall offer educational classes on the
United States Department of Housing and Urban Development code
construction and installation standards, to help building code enforcement
officers and any other interested parties, achieve certification, as determined by
the residential subcommittee.
(6) Local governments may charge a reasonable fee based on the formula
or schedule used for site-built residential housing to inspect the installation of
the home.
(7) All residential subcommittee licensees may hire a certified third party
provider, to conduct their installation inspections.
* * *
Section 3. R.S. 51:911.21 through 911.47 and 912.1 through 912.53 are hereby
repealed.
Section 4. This Act shall become effective on January 1, 2027.
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 48 of 48
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.